Maine, session 132, LD1063.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3210-K is enacted to read:
§3210-K. Energy procurement from generators fueled by municipal solid waste in
conjunction with recycling
1. Energy procurement from generators fueled by municipal solid waste in
conjunction with recycling. The commission shall direct investor-owned transmission
and distribution utilities to enter into one or more contracts for energy and renewable
energy credits from a generator fueled by municipal solid waste in conjunction with
recycling under section 3210, subsection 2, paragraph C, subparagraph (2), division (h),
referred to in this section as "a generator," that pays state excise, income, property and sales
taxes.
A. The commission shall initiate a competitive solicitation for contracts under this
section up to 35 megawatts for energy and renewable energy credits from generators.
B. The commission shall initiate the first competitive solicitation to select a generator
or a combination of generators for a contract under this section by November 1, 2025.
C. The commission shall select for contracts generators that provide the most benefit
to ratepayers and that have contract pricing levels below 7 cents per kilowatt-hour for
each contract year.
D. A contract submitted under this section must be for a term of not less than 5 years
and not more than 15 years, unless the commission determines a longer term is prudent.
2. Rules. The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules under Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter
2-A.